Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF1988.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 126C.17, subdivision 6, is amended to read: Subd. 6. Referendum equalization levy. (a) A district's referendum equalization levy equals the sum of the first tier referendum equalization levy and the second tier referendum equalization levy. (b) A district's first tier referendum equalization levy equals the district's first tier referendum equalization revenue times the lesser of one or the ratio of the district's referendum market value per resident pupil unit to deleted text begin $567,000deleted text end new text begin $1,500,000new text end . (c) A district's second tier referendum equalization levy equals the district's second tier referendum equalization revenue times the lesser of one or the ratio of the district's referendum market value per resident pupil unit to deleted text begin $290,000deleted text end new text begin $870,000new text end . new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective for revenue in fiscal year 2027 and later. new text end Sec. 2. new text begin APPROPRIATIONS.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Department of Education. new text end new text begin The sums indicated in this section are appropriated from the general fund to the Department of Education for the fiscal years designated. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin General education aid. new text end new text begin (a) For general education aid under Minnesota Statutes, section 126C.13, subdivision 4: new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin ....... new text end new text begin ..... new text end new text begin 2026 new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin ....... new text end new text begin ..... new text end new text begin 2027 new text end new text begin (b) The 2026 appropriation includes $....... for 2025 and $....... for 2026. new text end new text begin (c) The 2027 appropriation includes $....... for 2026 and $....... for 2027. new text end